Utah statutes.
20A-7-208.   Disposition of initiative petitions by the Legislature.

(1) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), when the lieutenant governor delivers an initiative petition to the Legislature, the law proposed by that initiative petition shall be either enacted or rejected without change or amendment by the Legislature.

(b)  The speaker of the House and the president of the Senate may direct legislative staff to:

(i)  make technical corrections authorized by Section 36-12-12; and

(ii)  prepare a legislative review note and a legislative fiscal note on the law proposed by the initiative petition.

(c)  If any law proposed by an initiative petition is enacted by the Legislature, it is subject to referendum the same as other laws.

(2)  If any law proposed by a petition is not enacted by the Legislature, that proposed law shall be submitted to a vote of the people at the next regular general election if:

(a)  sufficient additional signatures to the petition are first obtained to bring the total number of signatures up to the number required by Subsection 20A-7-201(2); and

(b)  those additional signatures are verified, certified by the county clerks, and declared sufficient by the lieutenant governor as provided in this part.



Amended by Chapter 115, 1999 General Session

